Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 26 Criminal Detention Facilities Standards
12-27-118. Employees' children — Transportation to school.

In order to provide adequate educational opportunities for school children of personnel employed at the various institutions of the Department of Correction, in those instances in which an institution includes territory in more than one (1) school district, school children living within the boundaries of the institution may attend schools in the district of their choice.

The school district in which the children choose to attend may provide transportation services and all other services normally provided school children of the district.

The authority granted in this section for a school district to transport children living within territory of an institution shall supersede any existing provision of law to the contrary.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning exemptions of prison officials and employees from jury and other duties, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 484, § 1. The section was derived from Acts 1893, No. 76, § 47, p. 121; C. & M. Dig., § 9725; Pope's Dig., § 12756; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-124.

It is the intent of this section to:

Allow those employees of the state penitentiary who participated before in the Arkansas State Penitentiary Employees' Retirement System to participate in and receive benefits from the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System; and

Provide that all other employees of the department shall participate in and receive the benefits of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System in the manner provided by law.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The Arkansas State Penitentiary Employees' Retirement System was abolished and all of its assets transferred to the Arkansas State Employees Retirement System [now Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System] by Acts 1965 (2nd Ex. Sess.), No. 12, § 6. The Arkansas State Penitentiary Employees' Retirement System was created by Acts 1957, No. 64, § 1.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System” for “Arkansas State Penitentiary Employees' Retirement System” throughout this section; in (c), inserted the subdivision (1) and (2) designations, substituted “Allow” for “continue to make available to,” deleted “opportunity to continue” preceding “to participate,” and substituted “and” for “but” at the end of (c)(1); and made stylistic and punctuation changes throughout this section.

Cross References. Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System, §24-4-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 41; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-126.

12-27-119. [Repealed.]

During their employment by the Department of Correction, all employees of the state penitentiary on March 1, 1968, shall be eligible for benefits under and shall participate in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

All employees of the department employed after March 1, 1968, shall be included in the membership of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and shall participate in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System in accordance with the laws governing the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System.

History.

Acts 1968 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 50, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 46-125; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 46.

12-27-121. Transfer of inmates to foreign countries.

The Governor is empowered to authorize the Department of Correction to participate, with the assistance of federal authorities, in any treaty between the United States and a foreign country for the transfer of inmates from the custody of the department to the proper authorities of a foreign country.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 775, § 1.

12-27-122. Debt service accounts.

The Division of Correction may establish accounts in financial institutions other than the State Treasury for the purpose of making debt service payments on bonds issued, or leases, or both, through the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and as otherwise authorized by law.

The accounts shall be entitled the “Construction Fund Deficiency Account”, the “Prisoner Housing Contract Account”, and the “Regional Facilities Operations Account”.

Receipts into the Construction Fund Deficiency Account, the Prisoner Housing Contract Account, and the Regional Facilities Operations Account shall be from transfers from the work-release cash funds, payments to the division for housing county and city prisoners in regional facilities, and such other sources as required.

Payments made by the division from the work-release cash funds, Construction Fund Deficiency Account, Prisoner Housing Contract Account, and the Regional Facilities Operations Account which are made for bonded indebtedness or leases of regional correction facilities, or both, are specifically exempt from §§ 19-4-801 — 19-4-803, 19-4-805, and 19-4-806.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment substituted “may” for “is authorized to” in (a)(1); substituted “Construction Fund Deficiency Account, the Prisoner Housing Contract Account, and the Regional Facilities Operations Account” for “accounts so established” in (a)(3); and substituted “§§19-4-801 —19-4-803” for “the provisions of §§19-4-801 —19-4-803,19-4-804 [repealed]” in (b).

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1993, No. 549, § 7, provided, in part, that the Board of Correction and Community Punishment shall succeed to all powers, functions, and duties formerly vested in the State Penitentiary Board and the Arkansas Adult Probation Commission. The Department of Community Punishment shall be created effective July 1, 1993, the same date that the Board of Correction and Community Punishment assumes its new duties and responsibilities.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in the section heading and (a)(1); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(2) through (a)(4).

Meaning of “this act”. Acts 1993, No. 549, codified as §§12-27-101,12-27-103 —12-27-105,12-27-107,12-27-113,12-27-124 —12-27-127,16-93-402 [repealed].

It shall assume management and control over all properties, both real and personal, facilities, books, records, equipment, supplies, materials, contracts, funds, moneys, equities, and all other properties belonging to the Arkansas Adult Probation Commission [abolished], and all such properties transferred from the Department of Correction, as the Division of Correction was known as prior to July 1, 2019, by the Board of Corrections;

It shall have management and control over all community correction services.

It shall have management and control over all community correction facilities within the purview of the Board of Corrections existing on or created after July 1, 1993;

It shall employ such officers, employees, and agents and shall secure such offices and quarters as deemed necessary to discharge the functions of the Division of Community Correction, and which are appropriately funded;

It may establish and operate regional community correction facilities if funds for the regional community correction facilities have been authorized and appropriated by the General Assembly;

It may exercise all legally sanctioned supervision and appropriate care over all offenders referred with proper documentation from the circuit courts and all offenders transferred with proper documentation from the Division of Correction pursuant to policies established by the Board of Corrections and conditions set by the Parole Board.

Legal custody remains with the referring court or the Division of Correction;

It shall administer the provision of probation services for offenders processed through circuit courts;

It shall administer the provision of parole services in coordination with the Parole Board and in cooperation with the Division of Correction;

It shall provide support services to the Parole Board or its designated representatives as determined by the Parole Board;

It shall assist the Board of Corrections in the furtherance of its goals by staffing the specific charges articulated for it through legislation and by the Board of Corrections;

It shall conduct statewide public education and training to foster the provision of correctional supervision and service in community settings;

It shall provide technical assistance when necessary to any entity, program, division, or agency receiving assistance or clients through the Division of Community Correction;

It shall facilitate the development of a comprehensive community correction plan through the provision of funding, criteria review, and ongoing evaluation to ensure the maintenance of quality in supervision and programming;

It may accept gifts, grants, and funds from both public and private sources with prior approval of the Board of Corrections;

It shall establish minimum standards for case loads, programs, facilities, and equipment and other aspects of the operation of community correction programs and facilities necessary for the provision of adequate and effective supervision and service;

It shall establish minimum standards for the employment of community correction employees;

It shall establish programs of research, evaluation, statistics, audit, and planning, including studies and evaluation of the performance of various functions and activities of the Department of Corrections and studies affecting the treatment of offenders and information about other programs;

It may receive and disburse moneys ordered to be paid by offenders pursuant to statutory economic sanctions.

It may receive fees to be levied by the courts or authorized by the Board of Corrections for participation in specified programs and to be paid by offenders on community correction.

The payment of such sanctions and fees may be a condition of probation, parole, or post prison transfer or attached to admission and participation in a community correction program.

The moneys collected shall be deposited into an earmarked account at the state level to be used solely for the continuation and expansion of community correction in this state.

Economic sanction officers are to be authorized by the Division of Community Correction to perform these duties pursuant to policies and procedures adopted by the Board of Corrections and in accord with any state statutory accounting requirements;

It may cooperate and contract with the federal government, with governmental agencies of Arkansas and other states, with political subdivisions of Arkansas, and with private contractors to provide and improve community correction options;

It may inspect and evaluate any community correction site and conduct audits of financial and service records at any reasonable time to determine compliance with the Board of Corrections' rules and standards;

It shall maintain a full and complete record of each offender under its supervision.

To protect the integrity of a record described in subdivision (b)(20)(A) of this section and to ensure its proper use, it is unlawful to permit inspection of or disclose information contained in a record described in subdivision (b)(20)(A) of this section or to copy or issue a copy of any part of the record except:

As authorized by administrative rule;

By order of a court of competent jurisdiction; or

Records posted on the Division of Community Correction's website as required by § 12-27-145.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The Arkansas Adult Probation Commission was merged with the Board of Correction to become the Board of Correction and Community Punishment by Acts 1993, No. 549, § 3.

Acts 2001, No. 323, § 1, provided:

“Legislative intent. The General Assembly, in Act 549 of 1993, established the Arkansas Department of Community Punishment and delineated its purposes. Confusion in the public's perception, with regard to the purposes of the department, exists and will persist because of the inconsistency between the name of the department and its established purposes. The purpose of this act is to provide the department with a name that more accurately describes its role as an agency that is intended to fulfill the legislatively established purposes of supervision, treatment, rehabilitation, and restoration of adult offenders as useful law-abiding citizens within the community and to provide its supervisory board with a name consistent with the department's name change.”

Acts 2001, No. 323, § 2, provided:

“The ‘Department of Community Punishment’, as established in Arkansas Code 12-27-125, shall hereafter be known as the ‘Department of Community Correction’.”

Acts 2019, No. 160, § 1, provided: “The Department of Community Correction may, with consent of the Board of Corrections and the Governor, donate the former site of the Southeast Arkansas Community Correction Center in Pine Bluff to an Arkansas-based nonprofit organization serving veterans of the United States Armed Forces if the proposed use by the nonprofit organization includes services approved by the Board of Corrections for veterans released from incarceration.”

Amendments. The 2015 amendment by No. 145 substituted “correction services” for “punishment services existing on July 1, 1993, and created thereafter” at the end of (b)(2)(A); and added (b)(22).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1265 inserted the (a) and (b) designations in (b)(20)(B)(i); substituted “rule” for “regulation or” in (b)(20)(B)(i)(a) ; added (b)(20)(B)(i)(c) ; and substituted “rules under subdivision (b)(20)(B)(i)(a) ” for “regulations” in (b)(20)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “policies and rules” for “policies, rules, and regulations” in the introductory language of (b); and deleted “regulations” following “rules” in (b)(19).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in the section heading and throughout the section, except in (b)(16), which substituted “Department of Corrections” for “Department of Community Correction; substituted “transferred from the Department of Correction, as the Division of Correction was known as prior to July 1, 2019,” for “deemed appropriate for transfer from the Department of Correction” in (b)(1); and substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (b)(5), (b)(7), (b)(22)(B)(i), and (b)(22)(B)(ii).

Subject to the rules, policies, and procedures prescribed by the Board of Corrections, the director shall:

Administer the Division of Community Correction and supervise the administration of all facilities, programs, and services under the Division of Community Correction's jurisdiction;

Employ such personnel as are required in the administration of the provisions of this act, provided that the employment of personnel shall be in accordance with the applicable laws and personnel rules of the state;

Institute programs for the training and development of personnel within the Division of Community Correction and have authority to suspend, discharge, or otherwise discipline personnel in accordance with policies prescribed by the Board of Corrections;

Make an annual report to the Board of Corrections, which will be forwarded to the Governor and the General Assembly, on the work of the Division of Community Correction, including statistics and other data, income derived from fee collection, a summary of expenditures of the Division of Community Correction, and progress reports regarding internal issues such as offender success, programming development, bed space utilization, and future needs; and

Cooperate with the Division of Correction, the Parole Board, the Arkansas Sentencing Commission, judicial districts, counties, and municipalities to provide the guidance and services required to ensure a full range of correctional and community correction options for the state as a whole.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1993, No. 953, § 13, provided:

“Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Governor shall initially appoint the Director of the Department of Community Punishment after which the Board of Correction and Community Punishment shall appoint the Director of the Department with the advice of the Governor.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “regulations” following “rules” in the introductory language of (d); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (d)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a) and throughout (d); and substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (d)(5).

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §12-27-124.

Time served in a community correction facility or under supervision by the Division of Community Correction shall be credited against the sentence contained in the commitment to the Division of Correction.

(1)In accordance with rules and procedures promulgated by the Board of Corrections, or except as otherwise prohibited by subdivision (c)(4) of this section, upon receipt of a referral from the director or his or her designee, the Parole Board may release from confinement an inmate who has been:

Sentenced and judicially or administratively transferred to the Division of Community Correction;

Incarcerated for a minimum of one hundred eighty (180) days; and

Determined by the Division of Community Correction to have successfully completed its therapeutic program.

(A)The General Assembly finds that the power granted to the Parole Board under subdivision (c)(1) of this section will:

Aid the therapeutic rehabilitation of the inmates judicially or administratively transferred to the Division of Community Correction; and

More efficiently use the correctional resources of the State of Arkansas.

The power granted to the Parole Board under subdivision (c)(1) of this section shall be the sole authority required for the accomplishment of the purposes set forth in this subdivision (c)(2), and when the Parole Board exercises its power under this section, it shall not be necessary for the Parole Board to comply with general provisions of other laws dealing with the minimum time constraints as applied to release eligibility.

This subsection does not grant the Parole Board or the Division of Community Correction the authority either to detain an inmate beyond the sentence imposed upon him or her by a transferring court or to shorten that sentence.

An inmate may not be released from confinement under this section if the inmate was sentenced and judicially or administratively transferred to the Division of Community Correction at a time earlier than that which would otherwise be possible if the inmate was sentenced to the Division of Correction, regardless of any program completed by the inmate.

(1)An inmate of the Division of Correction who is to be released on parole may be administratively transferred to the Division of Community Correction when the inmate is within eighteen (18) months of his or her projected release date for the purpose of participating in a reentry program of at least six (6) months in length.

Administratively transferred to the Division of Community Correction; and

Determined by the Division of Community Correction to have successfully completed its reentry program.

An inmate who has been administratively transferred under this subsection shall be administratively transferred back to the Division of Correction if he or she:

Is denied parole; or

Fails to complete or is removed from the reentry program.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment added (c).

The 2013 amendment deleted “pursuant to §16-93-1206(b)(3)” following “Department of Community Correction” in (a).

The 2015 amendment deleted “Judicial” at the beginning of the section heading; in (a), substituted “Unless a commitment specifies” for “All commitments shall specify” at the beginning, deleted “or” following “Correction”, and substituted “shall” for “will”; deleted “and regulations” preceding “promulgated” in (b)(1); deleted “and regulations” preceding “of the facility” at the end of (b)(3)(A); substituted “This subsection does not grant” for “Nothing in this subsection (c) shall be construed as granting” at the beginning of (c)(3); and added (d).

The 2017 amendment added “Transfer of an inmate between departments” to the section heading; in the introductory language of (a), substituted “A” for “Unless a commitment specifies that the inmate is to be judicially transferred to the Department of Community Correction, the” and added “unless”; added (a)(1) and (a)(2); inserted “or except as otherwise prohibited by subdivision (c)(4) of this section” in the introductory language of (c)(1); inserted “or administratively” in (c)(1)(A); substituted “one hundred eighty (180) days” for “two hundred seventy (270) days” in (c)(1)(B); inserted “or administratively” in (c)(2)(A)(i); added (c)(4); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction” and substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” throughout the section.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2005 Arkansas General Assembly, Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs, 28 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 365.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” throughout the section; and substituted “division” for “department” twice in (b) and in (c).

There is created in accordance with §§ 19-4-801 — 19-4-803, 19-4-804 [repealed], 19-4-805, 19-4-806, and the Revenue Classification Law, § 19-6-101 et seq., a cash fund entitled the Division of Correction Nontax Revenue Receipts Fund to consist of receipts for telephone calls from coinless telephones located on Division of Correction grounds, and from other nontax receipts not previously identified to a fund of deposit.

Funds held in the Division of Correction Nontax Revenue Receipts Fund are to be administered and expended by the Director of the Division of Correction within guidelines established by the Board of Corrections for periodic transfers to other division funds or for disbursements in support of division operations or debt service.

The division will request cash fund appropriations in accordance with established law and procedures after a determination by the board of the usage of the Division of Correction Nontax Revenue Receipts Fund.

The Division of Correction may report to the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs no later than December 1 of each year regarding its efforts in rehabilitating the inmate population.

(1)The report may include the division's rehabilitative efforts regarding inmate education, specific job training, behavior modification, psychological treatment and assistance, and substance abuse programs.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” and similar language in (b).

History.

Acts 1989, No. 819, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 250, § 20.

12-27-123. Supervision and transfer of employees.

All staff, employees, and other personnel of the Department of Correction shall be under the direct supervision and control of the Director of the Department of Correction, who shall report directly to the Board of Corrections.

The Compliance Division, which consists of but is not limited to a compliance attorney and an auditor, shall be under the direct authority of the board.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1078, §§ 28, 29; 1993, No. 885, § 1.

12-27-124. Purposes and construction of the Division of Community Correction.

(1)The purpose of this act is to establish a Division of Community Correction that shall assume the management of all community correction facilities and services, execute the orders of the criminal courts of the State of Arkansas, and provide for the supervision, treatment, rehabilitation, and restoration of adult offenders as useful law-abiding citizens within the community.

The division shall be under the supervision and control of the Board of Corrections.

To accomplish the objectives and purposes of this act in an effective, coordinated, and uniform manner, the division shall be responsible for the administration of all community correction facilities, services, and means of supervision, including probation and parole or any type of post-prison release or transfer.

Facilities and services shall be diversified in program, construction, and staff to provide effectually and efficiently for the maximum care, supervision, and treatment of those persons accessing the division.

This act shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate its purposes.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 549, § 7; 2019, No. 910, § 742.

12-27-125. Division of Community Correction — Creation — Powers and duties.

There is established, under the supervision, control, and direction of the Board of Corrections, a Division of Community Correction.

The Division of Community Correction shall have the following functions, powers, and duties, administered in accordance with the policies and rules promulgated by the Board of Corrections:

The rules under subdivision (b)(20)(B)(i)(a) shall provide for adequate standards of security and confidentiality of a record described in subdivision (b)(20)(A) of this section;

Subject to availability of funds, it shall employ officers, employees, and agents and secure sufficient offices for monitoring each sex offender on parole or probation who is required to register under the Sex Offender Registration Act of 1997, §12-12-901 et seq., and who has been assessed as a risk Level 3 or Level 4 offender; and

(A)It may issue an arrest warrant for the arrest of any person who, while in its custody, unlawfully escapes from the Division of Community Correction.

The arrest warrant shall authorize:

All law enforcement officers of this state to take into custody and return the person named in the arrest warrant to the custody of the Division of Community Correction or the Division of Correction; and

All law enforcement officers of this state, any other state, or the federal government to take into custody and detain the person in a suitable detention facility while awaiting further transfer to the Division of Community Correction or the Division of Correction.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 549, § 7; 1997, No. 280, § 1; 2006 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 4, § 8; 2015, No. 145, §§ 1, 2; 2015, No. 1265, § 6; 2019, No. 315, § 886; 2019, No. 910, §
743.

12-27-126. Director of the Division of Community Correction.

The Director of the Division of Community Correction shall be appointed by the Board of Corrections at a salary fixed by the Board of Corrections, which shall not exceed the maximum salary for the position established by law.

The director shall be qualified for the position by character, ability, education, training, and successful administrative experience in correctional, community correction, or related fields.

The director shall serve at the pleasure of the Board of Corrections.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 549, § 7;
2019, No. 315, § 887; 2019, No. 910, §§
744-746.

12-27-127. Transfer to the Division of Community Correction — Transfer of an inmate between divisions.

A commitment shall be treated as a commitment to the Division of Correction and subject to regular transfer eligibility unless:

The commitment specifies that the inmate is to be judicially transferred to the Division of Community Correction; or

If the court indicates on the commitment that the Division of Correction shall administratively determine the transfer of an inmate, the Division of Correction may administratively transfer a statutorily eligible inmate to the Division of Community Correction in accordance with rules promulgated by the Board of Corrections.

(1)In accordance with rules and procedures promulgated by the Board of Corrections and the orders of the committing court, the Director of the Division of Community Correction shall assign a newly transferred inmate to an appropriate facility, placement, program, or status within the Division of Community Correction.

The director may transfer an inmate from one facility, placement, program, or status to another facility, placement, program, or status consistent with the commitment, applicable law, and in accordance with treatment, training, and security needs.

(A)An inmate may be administratively transferred back to the Division of Correction from the Division of Community Correction by the Parole Board following a hearing in which the inmate is found ineligible for placement in a Division of Community Correction facility as he or she fails to meet the criteria or standards established by law or policy adopted by the Board of Corrections or has been found guilty of a violation of the rules of the facility.

Each inmate administratively transferred under this subsection shall be thoroughly screened and approved for participation by the director or his or her designee.

In accordance with rules promulgated by the Board of Corrections, upon receipt of a referral from the director or his or her designee, the Parole Board may release from incarceration an inmate who has been:

History.

Acts 1993, No. 549, § 8; 1995, No. 1170, § 5; 2005, No. 682, § 1; 2013, No. 1335, § 1; 2015, No. 146, § 1; 2017, No. 423, § 10; 2019, No. 910, §§ 747-751.

12-27-128. Division of Correction Nontax Revenue Receipts Fund.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 697, §§ 1-3; 2019, No. 910, § 752.

12-27-129. Report on rehabilitation.

Further, the report is to include the amount of meritorious good time awarded inmates by the division for the successful completion of the various rehabilitative programs.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 911, § 32; 1997, No. 324, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 753.

12-27-130. Reimbursement of county.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law or Division of Correction's commitment which may exist to the contrary, the Board of Corrections shall not increase any reimbursement rate for payments made to any county for the purpose of reimbursing the expenses of the care and custody of state inmates without first seeking and receiving the approval of the Governor and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 911, § 19; 1995, No. 158, § 13; 2019, No. 910, § 754.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 1071, § 15, provided:

“COUNTY REIMBURSEMENT RATE RESTRICTION. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or departmental commitment which may exist to the contrary, the Board of Corrections shall not increase any reimbursement rate for payments made to any county for the purpose of reimbursing the expenses of the care and custody of state inmates, without first seeking and receiving the approval of the Governor and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 266, § 15, provided: “COUNTY REIMBURSEMENT RATE RESTRICTION. Notwithstanding any other provision of law or departmental commitment which may exist to the contrary, the Board of Corrections shall not increase any reimbursement rate for payments made to any county for the purpose of reimbursing the expenses of the care and custody of state inmates, without first seeking and receiving the approval of the Governor and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction's” for “Department of Correction's”.

12-27-131. Receipts for reimbursement.

Receipts from cities or counties reimbursed to the Division of Correction for daily care of city or county prisoners shall be accounted for separately.

The debt service of such receipts shall be used for payment of debt service on bonds, loans, or any other instruments used to finance regional jail facilities.

The operational portion of such receipts shall also be used for debt service unless approval is received from the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration for other usages.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction” in (a); and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (c).

History.

Acts 1993, No. 911, § 30; 2019, No. 910, §§ 755, 756.

12-27-132. Award of pistol upon retirement or death.

When a Division of Community Correction parole or probation officer retires from service or dies while still employed with the division, in recognition of and appreciation for the service of the retiring or deceased parole or probation officer, the division may award the pistol carried by the officer at the time of his or her death or retirement from service to:

The parole or probation officer; or

The parole or probation officer's spouse if the spouse is eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in the introductory language of the section, substituted “Division of CommunityCorrection” for “Department of Community Correction”; and “division” for “department” twice.

Acts 2009, No. 365, §
1; 2019, No. 910, § 757.

12-27-133. Community Correction Revolving Fund.

There is created and established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a fund to be known as the “Community Correction Revolving Fund”, which shall consist of those special revenues as specified in §19-6-301(31) and fees and sanctions levied by the courts or authorized by the Board of Corrections for participation in specified programs to be paid by offenders on community correction, there to be used for continuation and expansion of community correction programs as established and approved by the board and as may be provided by law.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 953, § 5.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1993, No. 953, § 5, provided, in part:

“Any fund balances of the Arkansas Adult Probation Commission Fund and the Community Services Revolving Fund on June 30, 1993 shall be transferred to the Community Punishment Revolving Fund.”

Acts 2001, No. 323, § 4, provided:

“The ‘Community Punishment Revolving Fund’, as established in Arkansas Code 12-27-133 and 19-6-432, shall hereafter be known as the ‘Community Correction Revolving Fund’.”

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1993, No. 953, § 5, is also codified as §19-6-432.

12-27-134. Probation services.

The Division of Community Correction shall administer, in cooperation with the circuit courts, the provision of probation services as prescribed by the circuit courts.

The division shall establish an acceptable procedure that ensures the selection of qualified applicants to meet the needs of the circuit courts and includes subject matter experts from the circuit courts.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As originally enacted by Acts 1993, No. 953, § 14, this section also provided, in part:

“Any existing employee of an Arkansas circuit court adult probation department whose salary is paid in whole or part with State aid (probation supervision fees and/or financial aid regulated or funded by the Arkansas Adult Probation Commission) who is employed with an Arkansas circuit court adult probation department on June 30, 1993, shall be deemed a State employee for all purposes, and therefore shall enjoy the same benefits as regular State employees. An Arkansas circuit court adult probation department employee who becomes a State employee on July 1, 1993, who was employed at any time between April 1, 1984 and June 30, 1993, is entitled to credited service in the former position for the purposes of establishing eligibility for the same benefits as regular state employees.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of CommunityCorrection” for “Department of Community Correction” in (a); and substituted “division” for “department” in (b).

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules and procedures” for “rules, procedures, and regulations” in (a)(1).

History.

Acts 1993, No. 953, § 14; 2019, No. 910, § 758.

12-27-135. Facility assignment.

(1)In accordance with the rules and procedures promulgated by the Board of Corrections, the Director of the Division of Correction shall assign a newly committed inmate to an appropriate facility of the Division of Correction.

The director may transfer an inmate from one (1) facility to another consistent with the commitment and in accordance with treatment, training, and security needs.

All commitments to the division shall be to the division and not to a particular institution.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 658, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 888.

12-27-136. Services and equipment.

The Division of Correction and the Division of Community Correction may provide services, furnishings, equipment, and office space to assist the Parole Boardin fulfilling the purposes for which the board was created by law.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 195, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 759.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 977, § 3, provided:

“ASSISTANCE PROVISION. The Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction may provide services, furnishings, equipment and office space to assist the Parole Board in fulfilling the purposes for which the Board was created by law.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 54, § 3, provided:

“ASSISTANCE PROVISION. The Department of Correction and the Department of Community Correction may provide services, furnishings, equipment and office space to assist the Parole Board in fulfilling the purposes for which the Board was created by law.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1995, No. 195, § 3, is also codified as §16-93-208.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Correction” for “Department of Correction,” and “Division of Community Correction” for “Department of Community Correction”.